Utah statutes.
31A-7-309.   Transactions in which directors and others are interested.

Section 31A-5-414 applies to corporations organized and operating under this chapter, except that, for purposes of this chapter, Section 31A-5-414 does not preclude standard contracts for the provision of health care services with directors who are also providers of health care services.

